Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 35.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201071-531
Test; written
informed consent required; anonymous testing; exemptions.

(1)(a) No person may be tested for the presence of the human immunodeficiency
virus infection unless he or she has given written informed consent for the
performance of such test. The written informed consent shall provide an explanation
of human immunodeficiency virus infection and the meaning of both positive
and negative test results.

(b) If a person signs a general consent form for the performance
of medical tests or procedures which informs the person that a test for the
presence of the human immunodeficiency virus infection may be performed and
that the person may refuse to have such test performed, the signing of an
additional consent for the specific purpose of consenting to a test related
to human immunodeficiency virus is not required during the time in which the
general consent form is in effect.

(2) If a person is unable to provide consent, the person's
legal representative may provide consent. If the person's legal representative
cannot be located or is unavailable, a health care provider may authorize
the test when the test results are necessary for diagnostic purposes to provide
appropriate medical care.

(3) A person seeking a human immunodeficiency virus test
shall have the right to remain anonymous. A health care provider shall confidentially
refer such person to a site which provides anonymous testing.

(4) This section shall not apply to:

(a) The performance by a health care provider or a health
facility of a human immunodeficiency virus test when the health care provider
or health facility procures, processes, distributes, or uses a human body
part for a purpose specified under the Revised Uniform
Anatomical Gift Act and such test is necessary to assure medical acceptability
of such gift for the purposes intended;

(b) The performance by a health care provider or a health
facility of a human immunodeficiency virus test when such test is performed
with the consent and written authorization of the person being tested and
such test is for insurance underwriting purposes, written information about
the human immunodeficiency virus is provided, including, but not limited to,
the identification and reduction of risks, the person is informed of the result
of such test, and when the result is positive, the person is referred for
posttest counseling;

(c) The performance of a human immunodeficiency virus test
by licensed medical personnel of the Department of Correctional Services when
the subject of the test is committed to such department. Posttest counseling
shall be required for the subject if the test is positive. A person committed
to the Department of Correctional Services shall be informed by the department
(i) if he or she is being tested for the human immunodeficiency virus, (ii)
that education shall be provided to him or her about the human immunodeficiency
virus, including, but not limited to, the identification and reduction of
risks, and (iii) of the test result and the meaning of such result;

(d) Human immunodeficiency virus home collection kits licensed
by the federal Food and Drug Administration; or

(e) The performance of a human immunodeficiency virus test
performed pursuant to section 29-2290 or sections 71-507 to 71-513 or 71-514.01
to 71-514.05.

Laws 1994, LB 819, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 194, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 33;

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 35.

Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, see section 71-4824.